src/install/bin/server/open.office31/share/uno_packages/cache/uno_packages/15FF.tmp_/dict-fr.oxt/fr_FR.aff
FLAG long
SFX yX Y 34
SFX yX nuire nuire/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisant/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nui nuire
SFX yX nuire nuis nuire
SFX yX nuire nuie nuire
SFX yX nuire nuies nuire
SFX yX nuire nuit/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisons nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisez nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisent/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisait/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisions nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisiez nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisaient/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisit/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisîmes nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisîtes nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisirent/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuira/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuirons nuire
SFX yX nuire nuirez nuire
SFX yX nuire nuiront/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuirait/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuirions nuire
SFX yX nuire nuiriez nuire
SFX yX nuire nuiraient/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuise/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisions nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisiez nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisent/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisît/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisissions nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisissiez nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisissent/s' nuire

SFX yY Y 4
SFX yY ccire ccire/n'q'd'l'm't's' occire
SFX yY ccire ccis/q' occire
SFX yY ccire ccise/q' occire
SFX yY ccire ccises/q' occire

SFX yZ N 8
SFX yZ rire rire rire
SFX yZ rire rit rire
SFX yZ rire rits rire
SFX yZ rire rite rire
SFX yZ rire rites rire
SFX yZ rire ris rire
SFX yZ rire ris rire
SFX yZ rire rit rire
